Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.245

L.I.D.'s—Notice must contain statement that assessments may vary from estimates.

Any notice given to the public or to the owners of specific lots, tracts, or parcels of land relating to the formation of a local improvement district shall contain a statement that actual assessments may vary from assessment estimates so long as they do not exceed a figure equal to the increased true and fair value the improvement adds to the property.

[ 1989 c 243 s 4.]